Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-627
Uniform crime data analysis system.

The director shall develop and maintain a uniform crime data analysis system in Nebraska which shall include, but need not be limited to, the number of offenses, arrests, charges, probation admissions, probation violations, probation discharges, participants in specialized community corrections programs, admissions to and discharges from problem-solving courts, admissions to and discharges from the Department of Correctional Services, parole reviews, parole hearings, releases on parole, parole violations, and parole discharges. The data shall be categorized by statutory crime. The data shall be collected from the Board of Parole, the State Court Administrator, the Department of Correctional Services, the Office of Probation Administration, the Nebraska State Patrol, counties, local law enforcement, and any other entity associated with criminal justice. The division and the Supreme Court shall have access to such data to implement the Community Corrections Act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 39;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 17;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 54.